Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1 Emergency Communications District Law
7-86-114. Bond issues.

Subject to the approval of the legislative body of a county or municipality in which a district is established, each district has the power and is hereby authorized, from time to time, to issue negotiable bonds, notes and debt obligations for lease or lease purchases in anticipation of the collection of revenues for the purpose of constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, bettering or expanding any facility or service authorized by this part, or any combination of facility or service, and to pledge to the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds, notes or debt obligations all or any part of the revenues derived from the operation of such facility, service or combination of facility or service. There may be included in the costs for which bonds or notes are to be issued, reasonable allowances for legal, engineering and fiscal services, interest during construction, and for six (6) months after the estimated date of completion of construction, and other preliminary expenses, including the expenses of incorporation of the district.

No bond, note or debt obligation authorized in this section may be issued until the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, notes or debt obligations, together with a statement, shall show in detail the total outstanding bonds, notes, warrants, refunding bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness of the district, together with the maturity dates of the bonds, notes, warrants, refunding bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness, interest rates, special provisions for payment, the project to be funded by the bonds, notes or debt obligation, the current operating financial statement of the district and any other pertinent financial information, is submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for review, and the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may report on the financial information to the district within fifteen (15) days from the date the plan was received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, and the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall immediately acknowledge receipt in writing of the proposed issue statement and information. The report thus received by the district shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county of the principal office of the district, during the week following its receipt. After receiving the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, and after publication of such report, or after the expiration of fifteen (15) days from the date the statement and information are received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller’s designee, whichever date is earlier, the district may take such action with reference to the proposed issue as it deems advisable. Such report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall also be made a part of the bond, note or debt obligation transcript.

The bonds may be issued in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates, may bear interest at such rate or rates payable semi-annually, may be in such denomination, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may be payable at such place or places, may carry such registration and conversion privileges, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places, may be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, all as may be provided by resolution of the legislative body of the county. The bonds shall be fully negotiable for all purposes.

If any issue of such bonds or notes is to be sold to an agency of the federal government or an agency of the state, such bond or note issue may, at the request of such agency, be delivered as an installment bond or note payable as to principal and interest in equal or approximately equal installments for the term of such bond or note issue in accordance with the resolution authorizing such bond or note issue. Such authorizing resolution shall stipulate the annual principal and interest requirements during the full term of the bond or note issue.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit or limit the authority of the board of directors from entering into leases or lease purchases, so long as the term of the lease or leases does not exceed five (5) years, and no other approvals of the lease or leases shall be required.

Notes may be issued in the same manner as bonds, but shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding five (5) years.

The lease/lease purchase agreements authorized under this section shall be issued in the manner prescribed by chapter 51, part 9 of this title. For the purposes of applying chapter 51, part 9 of this title, the district board of directors is deemed to be the governing body except that, all lease/lease purchase agreements exceeding five (5) years shall be subject to the approval of the appropriate county or municipal governing body.

For the purposes of this section, and in §§ 7-86-115 — 7-86-117, “bond” or “bonds” are deemed to include notes.

For the purposes of this section, in §§ 7-86-116 and 7-86-117, “bond” or “bonds” includes debt obligations for lease/lease purchases.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, §§ 14, 15; 1992, ch. 891, §§ 4-8; 2010, ch. 868, § 29.

7-86-115. Liens — Defaults on bonds — Receiver.

There shall be and there is created a statutory lien in the nature of a mortgage lien upon any facility acquired or constructed in accordance with this part, including all extensions and improvements to the facilities or combinations of extensions and improvements to facilities subsequently made, which lien shall be in favor of the holder or holders of any bonds issued pursuant to this part, and all such property shall remain subject to such statutory lien until the payment in full of the principal of and interest on the bonds. Any holder of the bonds or any of the coupons representing interest of the bonds may either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, in any court of competent jurisdiction, protect and enforce such statutory lien and compel performance of all duties required by this part, including the making and collection of sufficient rates for the service or services, the proper accounting for the collections, and the performance of any duties required by covenants with the holders of any bond issued in accordance with this section. The statutory lien shall not apply to any property, liens, or equipment owned by the service supplier.

If any default be made in the payment of the principal of or interest on such bonds, any court having jurisdiction of the action may appoint a receiver to administer the district, and the facility or service, with power to charge and collect rates sufficient to provide for the payment of all bonds and obligations outstanding against the facility or service and for the payment of operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenues of the bonds, in conformity with this part, and any covenants with bondholders.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 16.

7-86-116. Payment of bonds and interest — Recitals on bonds.

No holder or holders of any bonds issued pursuant to this part shall ever have the right to compel the levy of any tax to pay the bonds or the interest on the bonds. Each bond shall recite in substance that the bond and interest on the bond are payable solely from the revenue pledged to the payment of the bonds and that the bond does not constitute a debt of the district within the meaning of any statutory limitation.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 17.

7-86-117. Exemption from taxation.

The district, and all properties at any time owned by it and the income from the properties and all bonds issued by it and the income from the bonds, shall be exempt from all taxation in the state.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 18.

7-86-118. Use of automatic dialer programmed to the emergency number — Resolution precluding use with security alarm systems.

The board of directors of an emergency communications district may, by resolution, vote to preclude service users from programming the emergency number “911” in automatic dialers used in conjunction with security alarm systems.

A fine not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) may be assessed by the board against any person violating such board decision.

Acts 1990, ch. 909, § 2.

Cross-References. Definition of automatic dialer, §7-86-103.

7-86-119. Surety bond.

Any board member, executive committee member, employee, officer, or any other authorized person of an emergency communications district, who receives public funds, has authority to make expenditures from public funds, or has access to any public funds is hereby required to give bond made payable to the state with such sureties as provided in this section. Such bond is to be conditioned in all cases in which a different condition is not prescribed, upon the faithful discharge of the duties of such office, employment or other authorized activity in which such person is engaged during the time such person continues in the duties, or in the discharge of any part of such duties.

An emergency communications district may purchase, in lieu of the surety bonds required by subdivision (a)(1), fidelity bonds to cover any losses from breach of the condition of faithful discharge of the duties of any board member, executive committee member, employee, officer, or any other authorized person of an emergency communications district who receives public funds, has authority to make expenditures from public funds, or has access to any public funds.

A fidelity bond purchased pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2) shall provide coverage for government crime and employee dishonesty that insures the lawful performance by officials and their employees of their fiduciary duties and responsibilities.

A fidelity bond purchased pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2) must be purchased from a corporation licensed to do business in this state pursuant to title 56, chapter 2.

A certificate evidencing the persons covered by the fidelity bond, the amount of coverage maintained, and the type of coverage provided shall be filed in the register's office for the county in which the emergency communications district is located.

A certificate filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(2)(D) shall satisfy the requirement for the filing of official bonds under subsection (e).

Provisions for bonds of all state and county officers set forth in title 8, chapter 19, shall also govern the bonds of all persons covered under this section, so far as the provisions of title 8, chapter 19, are not inconsistent with this section.

The minimum amount of such required bond shall be determined from the amount of revenues handled by the respective emergency communications district as reported in the last audit approved by the comptroller of the treasury. The minimum amount of the bond shall be based on revenues as follows:

Four percent (4%) of the revenues up to three million dollars ($3,000,000); and

Two percent (2%) of the revenues in excess of three million dollars ($3,000,000) shall be added.

The amounts indicated in subdivisions (c)(1)(A) and (B) shall be cumulative.

Surety bonds purchased pursuant to this section shall be signed by authorized individuals of a corporate surety, and such corporation shall be duly licensed to do business in the state as a surety.

The official bonds required under this section are hereby required to be recorded in the office of the register of deeds where the office of the emergency communications district is located and transmitted to the office of the county clerk in the same county for safekeeping.

The respective emergency communications district shall pay the premiums for such bonds.

Acts 1992, ch. 891, § 1; 1993, ch. 479, § 5; 2013, ch. 315, §§ 21, 22; 2017, ch. 418, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 315, § 31 provided that the act, which amended subdivision (c)(2) and subsection (e), shall apply to the renewal or obtaining an official bond for any bonding after April 29, 2013.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (a)(2); deleted former (c)(1); redesignated the introductory language of former (c)(2)(A) as the introductory language of present (c)(1); in the present introductory language of (c)(1), substituted “The” for “Effective July 1, 2013, the”; redesignated former (c)(2)(A)(i) and (c)(2)(A)(ii) as present (c)(1)(A) and (c)(1)(B), respectively; in present (c)(1)(A), substituted “of the revenues in excess of” for “of the excess over”; redesignated former (c)(2)(B) as present (c)(2); in present (c)(2), substituted “subdivisions (c)(1)(A) and (B)” for “subdivisions (2)(A)(i) and (ii)”; and, in (d), substituted “Surety bonds purchased pursuant to this section” for “All such official bonds”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 418, § 4. May 18, 2017.

7-86-120. Annual budget and fiscal plan.

The board of each district shall adopt and operate under an annual budget. The budget shall present a financial plan for the ensuing fiscal year, including at least the following information:

Estimates of proposed expenditures for each department, board, office or other agency of the district showing, in addition, the expenditures for corresponding items for the last preceding fiscal year, projected expenditures for the current fiscal year and reasons for recommended departures from the current appropriations pattern in such detail as may be prescribed by the board. It is the intent of this subdivision (a)(1) that all moneys received and expended by a district shall be included in the budget. Therefore, notwithstanding any other law, no district may expend any moneys regardless of their source, including moneys derived from bond and long-term note proceeds, federal, state or private grants or loans, or special assessments, except in accordance with a budget adopted under this section;

Statements of the bonded and other indebtedness of the district, including the debt redemption and interest requirements, the debt authorized and unissued, and the condition of the sinking fund;

Estimates of anticipated revenues of the district from all sources, including non-tax revenues and proceeds from the sale of any bonds, notes or other debt obligations with a comparative statement of the amounts received by the district from each of such sources for the last preceding fiscal year, the current fiscal year, and the coming fiscal year in such detail as may be prescribed by the board;

A schedule of salaries by position and the number of people employed by the district;

A statement of the estimated balance or deficit, as of the end of the current fiscal year;

A statement of pending capital projects and proposed new capital projects, relating to respective amounts proposed to be raised for capital projects by appropriations in the budget and the respective amounts, if any, proposed to be raised for capital projects by the issuance of bonds, notes or other debt obligations during the fiscal year; and

Such other supporting schedules as the board deems necessary, or is otherwise required by law.

Prior to adoption by the district, a copy of the proposed budget shall be filed with the clerk or recorder of the appropriate county or municipality, who shall then distribute copies to members of the appropriate legislative body and to members of municipal legislative bodies participating in the district, at least thirty (30) days before the next scheduled meeting of the legislative body. A copy of the proposed budget shall also be filed with the chief administrative officer of the appropriate county or municipality at the same time the budget is filed with the clerk or recorder. Prior to adoption of the budget, the board of directors shall hold a public hearing on the proposed budget for which adequate public notice has been given. Nothing in this subsection (b) shall prohibit a district from adopting the proposed budget or delay the orderly adoption of the annual budget by the district's board of directors.

Within thirty (30) days after the budget's adoption by the district board, the budget, and any amendments to the budget, shall be filed with the clerk or recorder of the appropriate county or municipality, who shall then distribute copies to members of the appropriate legislative body. Within thirty (30) days after its adoption by the district board, the budget, and any amendments to the budget shall be filed with the chief administrative officer of the appropriate county or municipality. Nothing in this subsection (c) shall prohibit or limit the authority of the board of directors from amending a budget after adoption.

Acts 1992, ch. 891, § 3; 1993, ch. 479, §§ 6, 7; 1995, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3.

7-86-121. Sale of bonds or notes — Revenue.

Bonds or notes issued pursuant to this part may be sold at either public sale or private negotiated sale.

All revenues, including any debt obligation issued for the purpose of a lease/lease purchase, must be expended according to the County Purchasing Law of 1983, compiled in title 5, chapter 14, part 2. For the purposes of applying title 5, chapter 14, part 2, the district board of directors is deemed to be the governing body.

Acts 1992, ch. 891, § 9.

7-86-122. Deposit and investment of idle funds.

In order to provide a safe temporary medium for the investment of idle funds, emergency communications districts shall deposit and invest idle funds according to §5-8-301.

Acts 1992, ch. 891, § 10.

7-86-123. Financial report.

At every regularly scheduled meeting of the board of directors, the board must be provided with a financial report of the emergency communication district's activities, in accordance with guidelines developed by the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1992, ch. 891, § 11.

7-86-124. Disbursement, transfer, withdrawal or investment of financial assets.

No member of the board of directors shall have control or custody of the financial assets of an emergency communications district. No member of the board of directors, on such member's sole authority, may authorize the disbursement, transfer, withdrawal or investment of any financial assets belonging to the emergency communications district.

Acts 1992, ch. 891, § 12.

7-86-125. Comprehensive travel regulations for district officers and employees.

The board of directors of each district shall adopt comprehensive travel regulations applicable to all officers and employees of the district. The minimum regulations shall be the same as those of the appropriate county or municipality that created the district. Nothing in this subsection (a) shall prohibit a district from adopting a more stringent policy. However, the district may establish a mileage allowance for travel up to, but not in excess of, the business standard mileage rate established by the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C.).

If the appropriate county or municipality does not have comprehensive travel regulations as described in subsection (a), the board shall adopt travel regulations. Such regulations shall determine how expenses will be reimbursed and what expenses are reimbursable. A copy of such travel regulations shall be open for public inspection and kept on file in the district office.

Acts 1993, ch. 479, § 8.

7-86-126. Security of district funds by depositories.

All funds deposited with a bank or other financial institution shall be secured by collateral in the same manner and under the same conditions as state deposits under title 9, chapter 4, parts 1 and 4, or as provided in a collateral pool created under title 9, chapter 4, part 5.

Acts 1993, ch. 479, § 9; 1995, ch. 62, § 1.

7-86-127. Street names and numbers.

Unless expressly provided otherwise by law, the authority to name public and private roads and streets, including roads and streets located within residential developments, and to assign property numbers relating to the roads and streets, is exclusively vested in the legislative bodies of counties for unincorporated areas, and municipalities within their incorporated boundaries; provided, that the exercise of this authority must be in a manner acceptable to the United States postal service.

The legislative bodies of any county or municipality may delegate the authority provided under this section to the emergency communications district, if there be one; provided, that the legislative body shall approve road or street name changes made by the district under such terms as the legislative body may determine.

Any county or city, including districts with delegated authority, may establish and impose reasonable fees and enforce policies relating to the changing of names of roads and streets, and may establish and enforce policies for the assignment and posting requirements of property numbers.

The legislative bodies of all counties and municipalities, or their designees, shall provide their local county election commissions an updated list of any modifications or changes to all house, road, or street names or numbers every six (6) months.

This section may not be construed to require a local government to maintain any portion of a road that the local government has not accepted.

Acts 1994, ch. 807, § 2; 1995, ch. 68, § 4; 1997, ch. 136, § 1; 2004, ch. 480, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1994, ch. 807, § 1, provided that the general assembly found that the “Emergency Communications District Law” has been successful, embraced by the vast majority of Tennessee counties, most of which have already initiated Enhanced 911 (“E-911”) service, and all of which are developing or maintaining this life-saving service in fulfillment of the purposes stated in the law. The general assembly also found that to more fully accomplish the purposes of the law, it is essential that each county have a uniform system of addressing which is consistent with regulations of the United States postal service in order to achieve maximum effect with minimum inconvenience to the public. The general assembly further found that the involvement of emergency communications districts in the addressing activity is necessary and complementary to the responsibility of local governments, which requires explicit definition.

Attorney General Opinions. A city, county, or emergency communications district may establish and enforce policies that require homeowners or businesses to mark their establishments clearly with their street number, OAG 01-057, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 49 (4/11/01).

If a county legislative body has created an emergency communications district, it may delegate authority to name public or private roads and streets to that district, OAG 03-088, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 107 (7/15/03).

If the general assembly chooses to exercise its authority to rename a public street or highway, its actions are controlling, OAG 06-054 (3/28/06).